Wyoming, session 2026, HB0121.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-14-213 is created to read:

39-14-213. Taxation of certain hydrogen production.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0121

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0034
(i) "Feedstock" means the raw material used to
produce hydrogen and includes without limitation water,
biomass, natural gas and other fossil fuels;

(ii) "Hydrogen" means hydrogen subject to
taxation under this section;

(iii) "Hydrogen production" means the separation
or extraction of hydrogen from a feedstock;

(iv) All other definitions in W.S. 39-14-201 are
incorporated herein by reference to the extent that they
may apply.

(b) Administration, confidentiality: The department
shall annually value and assess hydrogen production at its
fair market value for taxation in accordance with the
applicable provisions of W.S. 39-14-202.

(c) Taxable event: There is levied a severance tax on
the value of the gross product of hydrogen resulting from
hydrogen production in this state. The tax imposed by this
HB0121

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0034
subsection shall be in addition to all other taxes imposed
by law.

(d) Basis of tax: Hydrogen shall be valued for
taxation as natural gas as provided in W.S. 39-14-203(b).

(e) Taxpayer: Any person engaging in hydrogen
production or, to the extent of the person's ownership
interest, any person owning an interest in the hydrogen, is
liable for the payment of the severance tax together with
any penalties and interest. Nothing in this subsection
shall be deemed to require the tax to be paid more than one
(1) time for the same gross product as provided in this
section.

(f) Tax rate: Hydrogen resulting from hydrogen
production shall be subject to the following severance tax
rates:

(i) Except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this
subsection, hydrogen produced from water shall be subject
to a severance tax rate of nine percent (9%);

HB0121

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0034
(ii) Hydrogen produced from by-product water as
defined in W.S. 41-3-903 or hydrogen produced from any
feedstock or source other than water shall be subject to a
severance tax rate of three percent (3%).

(g) Exemptions: The exemptions from taxation provided
by W.S. 39-14-205 for natural gas shall apply to hydrogen
under this section.

(h) Compliance, collection procedures: The severance
tax related provisions of W.S. 39-14-207 shall apply to
hydrogen production.

(j) Enforcement: All severance tax related provisions
of W.S. 39-14-208 shall apply to hydrogen production.

(k) Taxpayer remedies: All severance tax related
provisions of W.S. 39-14-209 shall apply to hydrogen
production.

(m) Distribution: Severance tax revenues from
hydrogen production shall be distributed as provided by
W.S. 39-14-211.
HB0121

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0034

Section 2. This act shall apply to all hydrogen
production occurring on or after July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0121